Hawaii statutes.
[§486N-4] Copy of contract to buyer. A
copy of the health club contract shall be issued to the buyer at the time the
buyer signs the contract. [L 1984, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next